North Dakota statutes. TITLE 38 Mining and Gas and Oil Production
CHAPTER 38-14.1 Surface Mining and Reclamation Operations
38-14.1-28.
Enforcement procedures.

Whenever, on the basis of any information available to it, including information from any person, the commission has reason to believe that any requirement of this chapter or of any regulation adopted by the commission under this chapter or any permit condition has not been complied with, the commission shall immediately conduct an inspection, without a warrant, of the surface coal mining operation at which the alleged violation is occurring unless the information available is a result of a previous inspection of such operation. If, based on such inspection, the commission determines enforcement measures are appropriate, it shall initiate one of the following procedures:

If the commission or its authorized representative determines that any condition, practice, or violation exists which also creates an imminent danger to the health or safety of the public, or is causing, or can reasonably be expected to cause, significant, imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the commission or its authorized representative shall immediately order a cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations or the portion thereof relevant to the condition, practice, or violation. Such cessation order remains in effect until the commission or its authorized representative determines that the condition, practice, or violation has been abated, or until modified, vacated, or terminated by the commission or its authorized representative pursuant to paragraph 2.

When the commission finds that the ordered cessation will not completely abate the imminent danger or the significant imminent environmental harm, the commission shall, in addition to the cessation order, impose any remedial measures on the operator deemed necessary to abate the imminent danger or the significant environmental harm.

Any cessation order issued pursuant to this paragraph expires within thirty days of actual notice to the operator or permittee unless a public hearing is held within that period within such reasonable proximity of the site to allow viewings of the site during the course of the hearing.

If the commission or its authorized representative determines that any operator or permittee is in violation of any requirement of this chapter or regulations thereunder or any permit condition but it is unable to make the additional finding that a condition, practice or violation exists which also creates an imminent danger to the health or safety of the public, or is causing or can reasonably be expected to cause significant, imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the commission or its authorized representative shall serve on the operator or permittee a notice of violation. The notice must fix a reasonable time, not more than ninety days, for the abatement of the violation and shall provide opportunity for an informal conference pursuant to section 38-14.1-19 and for public hearing, if requested, pursuant to the procedures of section 38-14.1-30.

If the operator or permittee does not comply with the remedial measures set forth in the notice within the abatement period as originally fixed or subsequently extended for good cause shown and upon the written findings of the commission or its authorized representative, the commission or its authorized representative shall immediately order a cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations or that portion thereof relevant to the violation. Such cessation order remains in effect until the commission determines that the violation has been abated, or until modified, vacated, or terminated by the commission or pursuant to paragraph 2.

Any cessation order issued pursuant to this paragraph expires within thirty days of actual notice to the operator or permittee unless a public hearing is held within that period within such reasonable proximity of the site to allow viewings of the site during the course of the hearing.

If the commission or its authorized representative determines that a pattern of violations of any requirements of this chapter or of regulations thereunder or of any permit conditions exists or has existed and also finds that such violations are caused by the unwarranted failure of the permittee to comply with any requirements of this chapter or any permit conditions, or that such violations are willfully caused by the permittee, an order to show cause why the permit should not be suspended or revoked shall promptly issue from the commission or its authorized representative and opportunity for a hearing on such order pursuant to procedures in subsection 2 of section 38-14.1-30 must be provided. Upon the permittee’s failure to show cause why the permit should not be suspended or revoked, the commission or its authorized representative shall promptly suspend or revoke the permit.

Any notices and orders issued pursuant to subsection 1 must set forth with reasonable specificity the nature of the violation and any remedial action required, any period of time established for abatement, and a reasonable description of the portion of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation to which the notice or order applies. All such notices and orders must be in writing, must be signed by the commission or its authorized representative, and must be served promptly upon the operator and permittee personally or by certified mail addressed to the permanent address of the operator and permittee.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-29.
Procedures for imposing civil penalties.

A civil penalty may be assessed by the commission as authorized by section 38-14.1-32 only after the operator or permittee has been given an opportunity for public hearing pursuant to the procedures specified in section 38-14.1-30.

If such public hearing has been held, the commission shall make findings of fact and issue a written decision pursuant to subdivision g of subsection 3 of section 38-14.1-30 as to the occurrence of the violation and the amount of the penalty which is warranted, incorporating, when appropriate, an order requiring that the penalty be paid.

If the operator or permittee charged with such violation fails to use the opportunity for a public hearing, a civil penalty must be assessed by the commission if it determines that a violation did occur and issues a final order requiring that the penalty be paid.

Hearings under this section must be consolidated with any enforcement hearings under section 38-14.1-30.

Any civil penalties assessed under this chapter may be recovered by the commission in a civil action in the North Dakota district court for the county in which the violation occurred or in which the party assessed has the party’s residence or principal office in the state.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-30.
Administrative review of commission rulings — Formal hearings.

Within thirty days after a permit applicant is notified of a ruling by the commission pursuant to section 38-14.1-20, or after an operator or permittee is issued a notice or order pursuant to subdivision a or b of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-28, or after the commission disapproves an application for release of all or a portion of a performance bond under section 38-14.1-17, or after the director of the state historical society renders a decision on an application for approval of a cultural resources mitigation plan under section 38-14.1-10 and subdivision u of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-14, the applicant, operator, or permittee, or any person with an interest that is or may be adversely affected by the ruling, notice, or order or by an order modifying, vacating, or terminating a notice or order, may request and initiate formal hearing procedures before the commission. The right to the administrative review is forfeited if not requested within thirty days of the notification of any ruling or issuance of a notice of violation or order as provided in this subsection. The filing of an application for review under this subsection does not operate as a stay of any order or notice.

Following the issuance pursuant to subdivision c of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-28 of an order to show cause as to why a permit should not be suspended or revoked, the commission shall hold a public hearing pursuant to procedures specified in subsection 3 on such order to show cause. After such public hearing, the commission shall issue a written decision concerning suspension or revocation of the permit pursuant to subdivision g of subsection 3.

If the commission issues an order of permit suspension, it shall subsequently reinstate the permit in accordance with procedures established by commission regulations, upon a showing of compliance with the condition for reinstatement as specified in the suspension order.

If the permittee fails to comply with the conditions for reinstatement as specified in an order of suspension, the commission shall, pursuant to procedures established by commission regulations, issue an order revoking the permit and forfeiting the performance bond to the state of North Dakota.

If the commission revokes a permit, all surface coal mining operations must cease immediately in the permit area.

Administrative hearings pursuant to this section must be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 28-32 and the following procedures:

A hearing must be held within thirty days of a request for a formal hearing under subsection 1 or the issuance of an order to show cause under subsection 2.

The commission shall cause an investigation to be made as it deems appropriate in connection with any hearing under this section. Evidence taken at a hearing under this section held in connection with a permit application ruling under section 38-14.1-20 may include, but is not limited to, site inspections of the land to be affected and other surface coal mining operations carried on by the applicant for a permit in the general vicinity of the proposed operation.

Hearings held pursuant to this section are subject to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of chapter 28-32. Any requirements, procedural or otherwise, specifically imposed under this section which are in conflict with the provisions of chapter 28-32 shall supersede the provisions of chapter 28-32.

All parties to any informal conference held in reference to a permit application or application for release of performance bond under section 38-14.1-19, and all persons who submitted comments or written objections to the application for release of performance bond or the permit application under sections 38-14.1-17 and 38-14.1-18 respectively, and the permittee and other interested parties in hearings to review enforcement actions taken pursuant to section 38-14.1-28 must be given written notice of the date, place, and time of the hearing at least twenty days prior to the hearing under this section. In case of an emergency, the notification period may be shortened, but in no event may notice be given less than five days prior to the hearing.

In addition to any notice required by chapter 28-32, notice of hearings under this section must be published in the official newspaper of each county in which the subject matter of the hearing is located and in other daily newspapers of general circulation in the general vicinity of such counties, at least once a week for two successive weeks prior to the hearing. In case of an emergency, the publication period may be shortened, but in no event may notice be published less than five days prior to the hearing in daily newspapers of general circulation in the general locality of the subject matter involved.

No person who presides at an informal conference under section 38-14.1-19 in reference to a permit application may preside at a formal administrative hearing under this section or participate in making the final administrative decision pursuant to chapter 28-32.

All final orders of the commission under this section, except those issued under subsection 4, must be issued pursuant to the following procedures:

Whenever a formal hearing has been held, the commission shall issue a written order pursuant to chapter 28-32, provided that the decision must be issued within thirty days after the hearing. The commission shall have no discretion to increase such time period.

In the event that no one with standing to request an administrative hearing under subsection 1 requests such a hearing, the commission shall establish whether or not a permit should be granted or suspended or revoked; or, in enforcement proceedings, whether the violation has in fact occurred; or, in connection with an application for release of a bond, whether the application should be approved or denied, in whole or in part; and shall issue a final order as appropriate pursuant to rules adopted by the commission.

Pending completion of any investigation and hearing procedures being conducted under this section in connection with a request for review of a ruling on a permit application pursuant to section 38-14.1-20 or in connection with any notice or order issued pursuant to subdivision a or b of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-28 and at any time prior to a decision by the commission on the request for review of a ruling on a permit application or a request for review of a notice or order, the permittee or any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected by such notice, order, or the issuance of a permit may file with the commission a written request for temporary relief from such notice or order or permit decision together with a detailed statement giving reasons why such temporary relief should be granted. The commission shall issue an order granting or denying such relief expeditiously as provided by commission regulations. Provided, if the permittee or person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected requests relief from a cessation order, the commission’s order under this subsection must be issued within five days of receipt of such request. The commission may grant such relief, under such conditions as it may prescribe, if:

A hearing on the request for temporary relief has been held in the locality of the permit area, providing all parties with an opportunity to be heard and the requirements of subdivisions b and c have been met;

The permittee or person shows that there is substantial likelihood that the findings of the commission in the formal administrative proceedings being conducted pursuant to this section will be favorable to the permittee or person; and

Such relief will not adversely affect the health or safety of the public or cause significant, imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

Nothing in this section may be construed to eliminate any additional enforcement rights or procedures which may be available under state law but are not specifically enumerated herein.

An order granting or denying temporary relief pursuant to this subsection is final and not subject to review in any subsequent administrative or judicial proceeding since any temporary relief granted is in effect only until the investigation and hearing procedures of this section are completed.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1981, ch. 372, § 2; 1985, ch. 409, § 5; 1991, ch. 342, § 36; 1999, ch. 329, § 1; 2001, ch. 503, § 7.

38-14.1-31.
Civil action for injunctive relief.

In addition to other relief available, the commission may without bond or other undertaking institute a civil action for relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or any other appropriate order in the North Dakota district court for the district in which the surface mining and reclamation operation is located or in which the permittee thereof has the permittee’s principal office in the state, whenever such permittee or the permittee’s agent:

Fails to comply with any order or decision issued by the commission under this chapter;

Interferes with or delays the commission or its authorized representative in carrying out the provisions of this chapter;

Refuses to admit such authorized representative to the mine;

Refuses to permit inspection of the mine by such authorized representative;

Refuses to furnish any information or report requested by the commission in furtherance of this chapter;

Refuses to permit access to, and copying of, such records as the commission determines necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter; or

Refuses to permit inspection of monitoring equipment.

The court has jurisdiction to provide such relief as may be appropriate, including a permanent or temporary injunction or restraining order.

Any relief granted by the court to enforce an order or decision under subdivision a of subsection 1 continues in effect until the completion or termination of all proceedings for administrative and judicial review of such order or decision unless the district court granting relief under this section sets it aside or modifies it prior to such final determination.

No liability may accrue to the commission or its authorized representatives in proceeding against any operator or permittee pursuant to this section.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-32.
Penalties — Unclassified.

Any operator or permittee who violates this chapter, or any permit condition or regulation implementing this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars per day of such violation except that if such violation leads to the issuance of a cessation order, a civil penalty must be assessed. Each day of continuing violation may be deemed a separate violation for purposes of penalty assessments. In determining the amount of the penalty, consideration must be given to:

The operator’s or permittee’s history of previous violations at the particular surface coal mining operation;

The seriousness of the violation, including any irreparable harm to the environment and any hazard to the health or safety of the public;

Whether the operator or permittee was negligent; and

The demonstrated good faith of the operator or permittee charged in attempting to achieve rapid compliance after notification of the violation.

Any operator or permittee who fails to correct a violation for which a notice or order has been issued under section 38-14.1-28 within the period permitted for the accomplishment of remedial measures must be assessed a civil penalty of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars for each day during which such failure or violation continues.

Any person, operator, or permittee must, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both, who:

Knowingly engages in surface coal mining operations without previously securing a permit as required by this chapter;

Knowingly violates any permit condition or limitation implementing this chapter;

Willfully makes any false statement, representation, or certification, or willfully fails to make any statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under this chapter;

Willfully falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly and willfully renders inaccurate, any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under this chapter; or

Fails or refuses to comply with a final order by a court pursuant to section 38-14.1-35, an order issued by the commission pursuant to section 38-14.1-28, or any order incorporated in a final decision by the commission, except an order incorporated in a decision requiring the payment of a penalty.

Any operator or permittee who knowingly violates section 38-14.1-26 must, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

Any employee of the commission who willfully violates section 38-14.1-38 must, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment of not more than one year, or both.

Whenever a corporate permittee or limited liability company permittee violates a condition of a permit or fails or refuses to comply with an order issued by the commission pursuant to section 38-14.1-28, or any order incorporated in a final decision issued by the commission, except an order incorporated in a decision requiring the payment of a penalty, any director, officer, or agent of such corporation and any governor, manager, or agent of such limited liability company who willfully and knowingly authorized, or carried out such violation, failure, or refusal is subject to the same criminal and civil penalties, fines, and imprisonment that may be imposed under subsections 1 and 3.

Any action for the collection of civil penalties under this section must be tried in the district court for the county in which the alleged violation occurred or in which the person or operator alleged to have committed the violation has the person’s or operator’s residence or principal office in the state.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Organizational fines, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.1.

38-14.1-33.
Permit revocation — Bond forfeiture.

The commission may institute proceedings for the revocation of the permit and forfeiture of the performance bond of a permittee for violation by the permittee of any of the provisions of this chapter or of regulations implementing this chapter. The commission shall issue an order forfeiting the bond and revoking the permit of a permittee who fails to comply with an order of the commission suspending the permit pursuant to subsection 2 of section 38-14.1-30.

A permittee whose bond has been forfeited and permit revoked shall immediately cease all surface coal mining operations in this state. The permittee is not eligible to receive another permit unless the land for which the bond was forfeited has been reclaimed without cost to the state or the permittee has paid into the reclamation account a sum which, added to the value of the bond, the commission finds adequate to reclaim the land.

A permittee who refuses or willfully fails to comply with this chapter is ineligible for any further mining permits. After an opportunity for hearing and after a finding by the commission that the permit applicant, or operator specified in the application, controls or has controlled mining operations with a demonstrated pattern of willful violations of this chapter, or the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 445; 30 U.S.C. 1201, et seq.], of such nature and duration and with such resulting irreparable damage to the environment as to indicate an intent not to comply with the provisions of this chapter, or the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 445; 30 U.S.C. 1201, et seq.], no permit may be issued to said permit applicant or permittee.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1985, ch. 407, § 3.

38-14.1-34.
Administrative review of regulations.

Any person aggrieved or adversely affected by any regulation promulgated by the commission under this chapter may petition the commission for a hearing to reconsider or amend such regulation. The commission shall grant a public hearing pursuant to procedures established in chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-35.
Judicial review.

There is a right to judicial review pursuant to sections 28-32-42 through 28-32-49:

To any applicant or any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected who has participated in administrative proceedings under section 38-14.1-30 as an objector, and who is aggrieved by the decision of the commission.

To any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected who has participated in the administrative proceedings if the commission fails to act within the time limits specified in this chapter or in accordance with the provisions of chapter 28-32.

To any permittee who is subject to an order by the commission implementing a final decision to suspend or revoke the permittee’s permit under section 38-14.1-28 or to any operator or permittee who is subject to an order by the commission implementing a final decision imposing a penalty under section 38-14.1-29 or any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected by such order or by any modification, vacation, or termination of such order.

To any person claiming to be aggrieved or adversely affected by any regulation promulgated by the commission to carry out the provisions of this chapter or by any order of the commission or by its failure to enter an order.

Availability of judicial review under this section may not be construed to limit the operation of the rights established in section 38-14.1-40 except as provided therein.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 2001, ch. 293, § 16.

38-14.1-36.
Assessment of costs — Attorney’s fees.

Whenever an order is issued as a result of any administrative proceeding under this chapter, at the request of any party, a sum equal to the aggregate amount of all costs and expenses, including attorney’s fees as determined by the commission to have been reasonably incurred by such party for or in connection with the party’s participation in such proceedings, may be assessed against any party as the commission deems proper.

The court, in issuing any final order pursuant to chapter 28-32 in review of commission proceedings under this chapter may assess costs, including attorney’s fees against any party whenever the court determines such award is appropriate.

The court, in issuing any final order in a civil action brought under section 38-14.1-40 by any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected to compel compliance with this chapter, may award costs of litigation, including attorney’s and expert witness fees, to any party whenever the court determines such award is appropriate.

In civil proceedings pertaining to this chapter, the provisions of this section govern as herein provided, rather than those provided for in section 28-26-01.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-37.
Small operators.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to any of the following activities:

Extraction of coal or commercial leonardite by a landowner for the landowner’s own noncommercial use from land owned or leased by the landowner.

Extraction of coal or commercial leonardite as an incidental part of federal, state, or local government-financed highway or other construction under regulations established by the commission.

If the commission finds that the probable total annual production at all locations to be mined by any permit applicant will not exceed three hundred thousand tons [272155.41 metric tons], the cost of the following activities, which must be performed by a qualified public or private entity designated by the commission, may be assumed by the commission upon the written request of the operator in connection with a permit application:

The determination of probable hydrologic consequences required by subdivision o of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-14, including the engineering analyses and designs necessary for the determination.

The development of cross sections, maps, and plans required by subdivision r of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-14.

The geologic drilling and the statement of the result of test borings and core samplings required by subdivision s of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-14.

The collection of cultural resource information required by subdivision u of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-14, any other archaeological and historical information required by the director of the state historical society, and the preparation of mitigation plans necessitated thereby.

Preblast surveys required by subdivision e of subsection 13 of section 38-14.1-24.

The collection of site-specific resource information and the development of protection and enhancement plans for fish and wildlife habitats and other environmental values required by the commission in accordance with this chapter.

The commission may provide or assume the cost of training coal or commercial leonardite operators who meet the qualifications in subsection 2 concerning the preparation of permit applications and compliance with the regulatory program.

An operator who has received assistance under subsection 2 or 3 shall reimburse the commission for the cost of the services rendered if the commission finds that the operator’s actual and attributed annual production of coal or commercial leonardite for all locations exceeds three hundred thousand tons [272155.41 metric tons] during the twelve months immediately following the date the operator is issued a surface coal mining and reclamation permit.

Proposed surface coal mining operations that will not be subject to payment of reclamation fees required by the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 445; 30 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.] are not eligible for the assistance to small operators provided by subsections 2 and 3.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1989, ch. 439, § 1; 1993, ch. 372, § 1; 1995, ch. 360, § 1; 2001, ch. 503, § 8; 2015, ch. 257, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 19 of chapter 257, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

38-14.1-38.
Conflict of interest.

No employee of the commission performing any function or duty under this chapter may have a direct or indirect financial interest in any underground or surface coal mining operation. Whoever willfully violates this section is, upon conviction, subject to the penalty provided in subsection 5 of section 38-14.1-32. The commission shall promulgate regulations to establish methods by which the provisions of this section will be monitored and enforced by the commission, including appropriate provisions for the filing by such employees and the review of statements and supplements thereto concerning any financial interests which may be affected by this section.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1981, ch. 372, § 3.

38-14.1-39.
Forfeitures — Surface mining and reclamation fund — Continuing appropriation.

Performance bond forfeitures collected under this chapter must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to a special account designated as the surface mining and reclamation fund. All moneys deposited to the surface mining and reclamation fund are hereby appropriated to the commission for the purpose of reclaiming land affected by surface coal mining operations. The fund is not subject to section 54-44.1-11.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1983, ch. 412, § 1; 1989, ch. 440, § 1.

38-14.1-40.
Citizen suits.

Any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected may commence a civil action on the person’s own behalf to compel compliance with this chapter, or any regulation, order, or permit issued pursuant to this chapter:

Against any person or any governmental instrumentality or agency who is alleged to be in violation of any regulation, order, or permit issued pursuant to this chapter; or

Against the commission when there is alleged a failure of the commission to perform any act or duty under this chapter which is not discretionary with the commission.

Notice of the violation must be given to the commission and to any alleged violator sixty days before commencement of an action under subdivision a of subsection 1. Notice of the commencement of an action under subdivision b of subsection 1 must be given to the commission in such manner as the commission shall prescribe by regulation sixty days before commencement of such action, except that such action may be brought immediately after notification if the violation or order complained of constitutes an imminent threat to the health or safety of the plaintiff or would immediately affect a legal interest of the plaintiff.

No action may be commenced if the commission has commenced and is diligently prosecuting a civil action to require compliance with the provisions of this chapter, or any regulation, order, or permit issued pursuant to this chapter. In any such action, any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected may intervene as a matter of right.

Any person who is injured in person or property through the violation by any operator or permittee of any rule, order, or permit issued pursuant to this chapter may bring an action for damages, including reasonable attorney’s and expert witness fees, or for temporary or permanent equitable relief. This subsection does not affect the rights established by or limits imposed under the state workforce safety and insurance laws.

Any action brought under this section may be brought only in the district court in which the surface coal mining operation complained of is located. The commission, if not a party, may intervene in any such action as a matter of right.

Nothing in this section restricts any right which any person or class of persons may have under any statute or common law to seek enforcement of any of the provisions of this chapter and the regulations thereunder, or to seek any other relief, including relief against the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 41; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

38-14.1-41.
Chapter 28-32 to apply to this chapter — Regulations.

Chapter 28-32 applies to this chapter, except as otherwise provided in specific provisions of this chapter. The commission may promulgate regulations with respect to the administration of this chapter under chapter 28-32 except that if the commission determines that an emergency exists due to changes in federal performance standards promulgated under the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 445; 30 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.], and any amendments thereto, the commission may adopt emergency regulations in accordance with the purposes of this chapter, which are effective immediately upon approval by the attorney general. Such emergency regulations remain in effect for a period not to exceed ninety days unless a public hearing is held pursuant to sections 28-32-10 and 28-32-11.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-42.
Cooperation with federal and state agencies.

The commission shall have the authority to cooperate with and receive technical and financial assistance from the United States, any state, or any department, agency, or officer thereof, and to file such reports and promulgate regulations as required by federal law for any purposes relating to reclamation. In the administration, inspection, and enforcement of North Dakota’s reclamation program, the commission is also authorized and encouraged to cooperate with other federal and state agencies in order to eliminate duplication of effort and unnecessary review, establish a common database for similar reviews and timely decisions, and to promulgate rules and regulations relevant to such authorization.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.